test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-yedTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - ед: # Noun 'kettle' - full paradigm /Type 13/ ə-vartalo [MDTN-koodi ə≡]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom: ед
     ед+N+Sg+Acc: едмʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Gen: едʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Dat: еданʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Loc: едхана
     ед+N+Sg+Abl: едхад
     ед+N+Sg+Pros: едувна
     ед+N+Du+Nom: едхаʼ
     ед+N+Du+Acc: едхаʼ
     ед+N+Du+Gen: едхаʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Nom: едˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Acc: ед
     ед+N+Pl+Gen: едˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Dat: едхаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Loc: едхаˮна
     ед+N+Pl+Abl: едхат
     ед+N+Pl+Pros: едˮмана
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [едав, едув, едами, едми]
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [едав, едув, едами, едми]
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [едан, едани, едни] 
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [едхан, едхани]
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [едханан, едханани]
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [едхадан, едхадани, едхадни]
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [едувнан, едувнани]
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [едхаюн, едхаюни]
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [едхаюн, едхаюни]
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [едхаюн, едхаюни]
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [едан, едани, едни]
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [едан, едани, едни]
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [едаˮн, едˮни]
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [едхаˮн, едхаˮни]
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [едхаˮнан, едхаˮнани]
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [едхатан, едхатани, едхатни]
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [едˮманан, едˮманани]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: едар
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: едамд
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: еданд
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: едханд
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: едхананд
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: едхаданд
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: едувнанд
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: едхаюд
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: едхаюд
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: едхают
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: едад
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: едад
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: едат
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: едхат
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: едхаˮнат
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: едхатат
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: едˮманат
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [едада, едда]
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: едамда
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: еданда
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: едханда
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: едхананда
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: едхаданда
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: едувнанда
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: едхаюда
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: едхаюда
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: едхаюта
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [едада, едда]
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [едада, едда]
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: едта
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: едхата
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: едхаˮната
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [едхатата, едхатта]
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: едˮманата
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: [едамиʼ, едмиʼ]
#     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [едами, едми]  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: [едамиʼ, едмиʼ]
#     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [едами, едми]  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [еданиʼ, едниʼ]
#     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [едани, едни]  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: едханиʼ
#     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: едхани  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: едхананиʼ
#     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: едханани  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [едхаданиʼ, едхадниʼ]
#     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [едхадани, едхадни]  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: едувнаниʼ
#     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: едувнани  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: едхаюниʼ
#     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: едхаюни  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: едхаюниʼ
#     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: едхаюни  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: едхаюниʼ
#     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: едхаюни  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: [еданиʼ, едниʼ]
#     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [едани, едни]  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: [еданиʼ, едниʼ]
#     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [едани, едни]  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: едˮниʼ
#     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: едˮни  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: едхаˮниʼ
#     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: едхаˮни  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: едхаˮнаниʼ
#     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: едхаˮнани  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [едхатаниʼ, едхатниʼ]
#     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [едхатани, едхатни]  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: едˮмананиʼ
#     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: едˮманани  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: [едариʼ, едриʼ]
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: едамдиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: едандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: едхандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: едханандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: едхадандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: едувнандиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: едхаюдиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: едхаюдиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: едхаютиʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: [едадиʼ, еддиʼ]
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: [едадиʼ, еддиʼ]
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: едтиʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: едхатиʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: едхаˮнатиʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [едхататиʼ, едхаттиʼ]
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: едˮманатиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: [едадиʼ, еддиʼ]
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: едамдиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: едандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: едхандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: едханандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: едхадандиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: едувнандиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: едхаюдиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: едхаюдиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: едхаютиʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: [едадиʼ, еддиʼ]
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: [едадиʼ, еддиʼ]
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: едтиʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: едхатиʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: едхаˮнатиʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [едхататиʼ, едхаттиʼ]
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: едˮманатиʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: [едаваˮ, едваˮ]
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: [едаваˮ, едваˮ]
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: [еданаˮ, еднаˮ]
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: едханаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: едхананаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [едхаданаˮ, едхаднаˮ]
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: едувнанаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: едхаюнаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: едхаюнаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: едхаюнаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: [еданаˮ, еднаˮ]
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: [еданаˮ, еднаˮ]
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: едˮнаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: едхаˮнаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: едхаˮнанаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [едхатанаˮ, едхатнаˮ]
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: едˮмананаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: [едараˮ, едраˮ]
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: едамдаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: едандаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: едхандаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: едханандаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: едхадандаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: едувнандаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: едхаюдаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: едхаюдаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: едхаютаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: [едадаˮ, еддаˮ]
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: [едадаˮ, еддаˮ]
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: едтаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: едхатаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: едхаˮнатаˮ
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [едхататаˮ, едхаттаˮ]
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: едˮманатаˮ
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: [едадоʼ, еддоʼ]
     ед+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: едамдоʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: едандоʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: едхандоʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: едханандоʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: едхадандоʼ
     ед+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: едувнандоʼ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: едхаюдоʼ
     ед+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: едхаюдоʼ
     ед+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: едхаютоʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: [едадоʼ, еддоʼ]
     ед+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: [едадоʼ, еддоʼ]
     ед+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: едтоʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: едхатоʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: едхаˮнатоʼ
     ед+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [едхататоʼ, едхаттоʼ]
     ед+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: едˮманатоʼ
     ед+N+Pred+Abs: едад
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [едадав, еддав, едадув, еддув, едадами, еддами]
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [едадав, еддав, едадув, еддув, едадами, еддами]
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [едадан, еддан, едадани, еддани]
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: [едадар, еддар]
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: [едадамд, еддамд]
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: [едаданд, едданд]
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [едадада, еддада]
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: [едадамда, еддамда]
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: [едаданда, едданда]
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [едадамиʼ, еддамиʼ]
#     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [едадами, еддами]  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [едадамиʼ, еддамиʼ]
#     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [едадами, еддами]  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [едаданиʼ, едданиʼ]
#     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [едадани, еддани]  #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [едадариʼ, еддариʼ]
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: [едадамдиʼ, еддамдиʼ]
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: [едадандиʼ, еддандиʼ]
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [едададиʼ, еддадиʼ]
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: [едадамдиʼ, еддамдиʼ]
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: [едадандиʼ, еддандиʼ]
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [едадаваˮ, еддаваˮ]
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [едадаваˮ, еддаваˮ]
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [едаданаˮ, едданаˮ]
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [едадараˮ, еддараˮ]
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: [едадамдаˮ, еддамдаˮ]
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: [едадандаˮ, еддандаˮ]
     ед+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [едададоʼ, еддадоʼ]
     ед+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: [едадамдоʼ, еддамдоʼ]
     ед+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: [едадандоʼ, еддандоʼ]
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: едадмʼ
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: едан
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ед
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: [еданиʼ, едниʼ]
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: [едадиʼ, еддиʼ]
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: едхаʼ
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: [едаваˮ, едваˮ]
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: [едадаˮ, еддаˮ]
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: едˮ
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: [едадамзь, еддамзь]
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: [еданась, еднась]
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: едась
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: [еданинзь, еднинзь]
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: [едадинзь, еддинзь]
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: едханзь
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: [едаваць, едваць]
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: [едадаць, еддаць]
     ед+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: едаць
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [едав, едув]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: едар
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [едада, едда]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [едамиʼ, едмиʼ]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [едариʼ, едриʼ]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [едадиʼ, еддиʼ]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [едаваˮ, едваˮ]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [едараˮ, едраˮ]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [едадоʼ, еддоʼ]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [едавась, едвась]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [едарась, едрась]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [едадась, еддась]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [едаминзь, едминзь]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [едаринзь, едринзь]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [едадинзь, еддинзь]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [едаваць, едваць]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [едараць, едраць]
     ед+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [едадонзь, еддонзь]
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: едхаюн
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: едхаюд
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: едхаюда
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: едхаюниʼ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: едхаюдиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: едхаюдиʼ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: едхаюнаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: едхаюдаˮ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: едхаюдоʼ
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: едхаюнась
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: едхаюдась
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: едхаюдась
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: едхаюнинзь
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: едхаюдинзь
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: едхаюдинзь
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: едхаюнаць
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: едхаюдаць
     ед+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: едхаюдонзь
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: едан
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: едад
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [едада, едда]
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [еданиʼ, едниʼ]
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [едадиʼ, еддиʼ]
     ед+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: [едадиʼ, еддиʼ]
